Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1578
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1578 to 81-15,116 shall be known and may be cited as the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 837, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 716, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1201, § 3.